Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 6. Contested Cases

Eight-month wait for court order not illegal. —

Former § 27-12-604(d) was not violated when a district court waited over eight months to issue its order, absent a showing of resultant prejudice. In re Smith, 762 P.2d 1193,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Painter v. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div., 931 P.2d 953,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1997), overruled on other grounds, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

82 Am. Jur. 2d Workmen's Compensation §§ 602 to 633.

100 C.J.S. Workmen's Compensation § 414 et seq.

§ 27-14-601.
Payment or denial of claim by division; notice; objections; review and settlement of claims; filing fee; preauthorization of hospitalization or surgery.

Upon receipt, the division shall review the initial injury reports to determine if the injury or death resulting from injury is compensable and within the jurisdiction of this act. No subsequent claim for compensation under this act shall be approved if the division determines the injury or death is not compensable and under the jurisdiction of this act or if the employer states on his injury report that the injury is not compensable, until a determination is rendered by the division. The division shall provide notice of its determination to the employee, employer and the claimant.

Following review of each bill and claim for medical and hospital care pursuant to W.S. 27-14-401(b), the division may approve or deny payment of all or portions of the entire amount claimed and shall:

Notify the employee and the health care provider in writing of any portion of a claim for which the employee may be liable for payment;

Provide the health care provider with a detailed monthly statement of respective claims and bills for services rendered and the amount approved for payment;

Provide the employer with a detailed monthly statement of all medical and hospital claims affecting his experience rating.

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 86, § 3.

Upon receipt of a claim for impairment, disability or death benefits filed under W.S.

27-14-403

(g) or 27-14-501(e) and (f) and if the initial injury or death resulting from injury is determined compensable and within the jurisdiction of this act, the division shall determine if the injured employee or his dependents are eligible for benefits and shall approve or deny the claim in accordance with this act. If a claim is approved, the division shall determine the amount of the award for compensation in accordance with W.S.

27-14-403

through

27-14-406

and

27-14-408

, if applicable. The division shall provide notice of any determination under this subsection to the employer, employee and the claimant.

In accordance with this act, the division shall by rule and regulation establish necessary procedures for the review and settlement of the compensability of an injury or death resulting from injury and of claims filed under this act through interviews with employees, employers and health care personnel or through review of written reports. Nothing in this act shall prohibit the employer or division from reaching a settlement of up to two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00) under this subsection in any one (1) case without an admission of compensability or that the injury was work related.

A health care provider receiving payment erroneously under this act pursuant to a determination by the division following review and settlement under subsection (e) of this section or a decision by a hearing examiner is liable for repayment to the worker’s compensation account. Except in contested cases, the division may deduct the amount liable from future payments under this act limited to deduction of those mistaken payments made for services provided within twelve (12) months before the deduction. If necessary, the division may recover repayment by civil action as provided in W.S.

27-14-511

.

No claim for benefits under this act shall be denied based solely on the failure of the employer to have complied with the requirements of this act.

If any claim under W.S.

27-14-404

through

27-14-406

which has been approved and for which an employee is receiving benefits is objected to by an employer, the employee shall be notified by the division within one (1) working day of the objection.

Notice to any employee or his dependents under this section of a final determination by the division denying the compensability of an initial injury, a claim for medical or hospital care for which the employee or his dependents may be liable for payment or denying any impairment, disability or death benefit, shall include reasons for denial and a statement of the employee’s or his dependents’ rights to a hearing before a hearing examiner as provided by this act and to legal representation.

Determinations by the division pursuant to this section and W.S.

27-14-605

shall be in accordance with the following:

The initial review of entitlement to benefits pursuant to subsections (a) and (e) of this section shall be made by the division within fifteen (15) days after the date the injury report or claim is filed. Following initial review, the division shall issue a final determination or if a final determination cannot be made based upon available information at that time, the division may issue a request for additional information as necessary;

Following issuance of a request for additional information under paragraph (k)(i) of this section, the division shall investigate the matter and issue its final determination within forty-five (45) days after issuing the request;

Notice of a final determination issued by the division under this subsection shall include a statement of reasons and notice of the right to a hearing;

Any interested party may request a hearing before a hearing examiner on the final determination of the division by filing a written request for hearing with the division within fifteen (15) days after the date the notice of the final determination was mailed by the division. If the division has not rendered a final determination within sixty (60) days following the date the claim was filed, any interested party may request a hearing before a hearing examiner in the manner prescribed by this paragraph. The date a written request for hearing is filed shall be determined pursuant to W.S. 16-4-301(a);

Upon receipt of a request for hearing, the division shall immediately provide notice of the request to the appropriate hearing authority as determined pursuant to W.S.

27-14-616

;

If timely written request for hearing is not filed, the final determination by the division pursuant to this subsection shall not be subject to further administrative or judicial review, provided however that, in its own discretion, the division may, whenever benefits have been denied to a worker, make a redetermination within one (1) year after the date of an original determination regardless of whether or not a party has filed a timely appeal pursuant to paragraph (iv) of this subsection.

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 82, § 2.

The division shall maintain a complete and current file for every worker’s compensation case filed with the division in accordance with this act.

The division pursuant to its rules and regulations may issue a determination of preauthorization for an injured worker’s nonemergency hospitalization, surgery or other specific medical care, subject to the following:

The division’s determination that the worker suffered a compensable injury is final and not currently subject to contested case or judicial review;

A claim for preauthorization is filed by a health care provider on behalf of the injured worker;

The division’s determination pursuant to this subsection is issued in accordance with the procedures provided in subsection (k) of this section;

Following a final determination to preauthorize, the necessity of the hospitalization, surgery or specific medical care shall not be subject to further review and providers’ bills shall be reviewed only for relatedness to the preauthorized care and reasonableness in accord with the division’s fee schedules.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 264, § 2; 1994, ch. 86, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 172, § 1; 1996, ch. 82, §§ 1, 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 10, § 1; 2005, ch. 185, § 2; 2009, ch. 156, § 1; 2016 ch. 36, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (o).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (f), in the second sentence, added “Except in contested cases” at the beginning and added “limited to deduction of those mistaken payments made for services provided within twelve (12) months before the deduction” at the end, and in the third sentence, added “as provided in W.S.

27-14-511

” at the end.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, rewrote the former last sentence, which read: “If the written request for hearing is sent to the division by certified or registered mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, proof of such mailing within the time provided by this subsection with a receipt signed by an agent of the state of Wyoming shall be presumed to be timely filing of the request with the division” in (k)(iv).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

ARTICLE: Damned if You do, Damned if You Don't: A Contextual Analysis of Co-Employee Liability and Wyoming Workers' Compensation Subrogation, 16 Wyo. L. Rev. 415 (2016).

Preauthorization denied. —

There was
substantial evidence presented through a doctor to support the hearing
examiner's conclusion that the proposed treatment of implantation
of a spinal cord stimulator was causally related to the worker's workplace
injury, however, there was also substantial evidence to support the
conclusion that the stimulator was not medically necessary; while
physicians generally agreed that implantation of a stimulator was
reasonable treatment, it was not reasonable treatment for the employee
under these circumstances, as no physician testified as to the resolution
of the employee's primary complaints, and the denial of preauthorization
was affirmed. Hildebrant v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2015 WY 41, 345 P.3d 875,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2015).

Employer's late objection. —

Representation by a workers' compensation division employee to an employer that the employer could file a late objection to an award, which representation was made after the deadline for objecting had passed, did not estop the Office of Administrative Hearings from granting judgment to the employee under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-601(k)(vi) because the objection was untimely. Schwab v. JTL Group, Inc., 2013 WY 138, 312 P.3d 790,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2013).

Collateral estoppel. —

First Office of Administrative Hearings (OAH) order was not a final appealable order and therefore collateral estoppel was not applicable because it was not a prior adjudication of workers’ compensation benefits, even though it vacated the hearing and directed the Department of Workforce Services, Workers’ Compensation Division to award the claimant workers’ compensation benefits, as the OAH had not heard evidence or argument from the parties and it returned the case to the Division prior to any substantive action. Lower v. Peabody Powder River Servs., LLC ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2020 WY 33, 459 P.3d 443,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 3

3 (Wyo. 2020);

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(March 4, 2020).

Order remanding case for hearing not appealable. —

District court's order remanding a worker's compensation case to the Office of Administrative Hearings (OAH) was not a final, appealable order under Wyo. R. App. P. 1.05(a); however, the appellate court could and did convert the notice of appeal to a writ of review pursuant to Wyo. R. App. P. 13. Schwab v. JTL Group, Inc., 2013 WY 138, 312 P.3d 790,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2013).

Applicability. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

27-14-601

did not require the Wyoming Workers'
Safety and Compensation Division to inform the employee that she filed an incorrect form or did not fill it out correctly; it simply required the Division to make a determination as to whether the employee was eligible for benefits and provide notice of that determination to the interested parties.
Bailey v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2010 WY 152, 243 P.3d 953,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2010).

Processing of claims is a procedural right

that was properly conducted under the Internal Hearing Unit even though the Internal Hearing Unit was created after plaintiff's injury. Internal Hearing Unit. Sheneman v. Division of Workers' Safety & Comp. Internal Hearing Unit, 956 P.2d 344,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1998).

Authority to analyze each charge for relation to workplace injury. —

Division was not estopped from denying benefits based on its issuance of decision stating that claimant's injury was compensable, since that decision was distinct from division's authority to analyze each charge submitted by claimant to determine whether such charge was causally related to workplace injury. Armstrong v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 991 P.2d 140,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1999).

Determining causation when death occurs as a result of second injury. —

Supreme court of Wyoming expressly rejects the “quasi-course of employment” theory of recovery for death benefits under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-601(a); in order for a second injury to be compensable, original compensable injury must itself be the direct cause of the subsequent injury.
Fisher v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safey & Compensation Division (In re Fisher), 2008 WY 89, 189 P.3d 866,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2008).

District judges may employ assistants in making investigations

who are entitled to compensation and expenses. Sheridan Coal Co. v. Harnesberger, 43 Wyo. 226, 3 P.2d 80,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1931).

Clerk has authority to deny claim for benefits. —

Harris v. State, 736 P.2d 309,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 434

(Wyo. 1987) (decided prior to 1989 amendment).

Final determination. —

Because “final determination” refers to the written letter of the Department of Employment Worker's Safety and Compensation Division (division) responding to a claim, its use in § 27-14-601(k)(vi) does not preclude review of the division's decision that a request for a contested case hearing is timely; should the review affirm the untimeliness decision, the “final determination” is not subject to further review. Appleby v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2002 WY 84, 47 P.3d 613,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 2002).

Employer's failure to file objection. —

Employer's letter to division on day following employee's filing of claim could not act as a “continuing objection” to employee's claim, because it preceded issuance of division's final determination and did not request a hearing; final determination was therefore not subject to further administrative or judicial review, due to employer's failure to exercise its right to hearing within time allowed under subdivision (k) of this section. Pacificorp v. Todd, 1 P.3d 1216,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2000).

Employee's burden of proof. —

Despite preauthorization under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-601(o) by the Wyoming Workers'
Safety and Compensation Division for a procedure to remove an employee's left testicle, the burden remained with the employee to prove that he was entitled to reimbursement for his medical expenses; the employee failed to meet that burden.
Beall v. Sky Blue Enters. (In re Beall), 2012 WY 38, 271 P.3d 1022,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 2012).

Rule 60(b), W.R.C.P., inapplicable where employee fails to file objection. —

A 1994 amendment to this section specifically precluding “further administrative or judicial review” absent a timely written request for hearing renders Wyo. R. Civ. P. 60(b) inapplicable in cases where the employee fails to file a timely written objection. Bila v. Accurate Telecom, 964 P.2d 1270,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1998).

Reasons for objecting not required. —

A claimant is not required under § 27-14-601(k)(iv) to state reasons for objecting in order to secure a contested case hearing; the Department of Employment Worker's Safety and Compensation Division lacks authority to require a claimant to provide a reason for objecting to the final determination in a written request for hearing. Appleby v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2002 WY 84, 47 P.3d 613,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 2002).

Who are entitled to reasonable compensation. —

Assistants employed by the court are only entitled to a reasonable compensation for the services performed. Sheridan Coal Co. v. Harnesberger, 43 Wyo. 226, 3 P.2d 80,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1931).

Division erred by denying claim for death benefits. —

Where work-related injuries rendered decedent a paraplegic who died 12 years later from smoke inhalation after a fire at his home because his paraplegia rendered him unable to cough with sufficient force to expel mucus from his lungs, the Wyoming Workers'
Safety and Compensation Division erred by finding that decedent did not die as a result of a work-related injury; the supreme court of Wyoming held that his surviving spouse was entitled to receive death benefits under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-601(a).
Fisher v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safey & Compensation Division (In re Fisher), 2008 WY 89, 189 P.3d 866,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2008).

Limitation on appointment of investigator. —

The appointment of an official investigator to whom every claim would automatically be referred and who would be paid fixed fees is not authorized. Wyoming State Treasurer ex rel. Workmen's Compensation Dep't v. Christiansen, 491 P.2d 1251,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 273

(Wyo. 1971).

Claimant's request for hearing was untimely. —

Where the division's final determination provided claimant the required notice of a right to a hearing before a hearing examiner and correctly calculated the deadline for receipt of his response by the division in order to secure this right, and the division received claimant's written response two days beyond the deadline, the hearing examiner's determination that claimant's request for hearing was timely filed was unsupported by substantial evidence. Sherwin-Williams Co. v. Borchert, 994 P.2d 959,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2000), reh'g denied,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. Feb. 8, 2000).

Collateral estoppel. —

An uncontested final determination by the division denying a worker's compensation claim will not be given collateral estoppel effect in subsequent proceedings for outstanding claims, and claimant was not precluded from establishing, for purposes of her outstanding claims, that her hip and knee ailments were directly related to her earlier ankle injury and its treatment. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div. v. Jackson, 994 P.2d 320,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1999).

Claimant was not collaterally estopped from challenging the Wyoming Workers' Compensation Division's final determination because the claimant's failure to object to the Division's earlier final determination did not preclude the claimant's objection to the Division's later final determination denying benefits to cover MRI costs. Whether the claimant's MRI was compensable as diagnostic testing depended on whether the evidence showed an objective indication of a physiologic connection between the claimant's injury and the diagnostic measure. Porter v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs. (In re Worker's Comp. Claim), 2017 WY 69, 396 P.3d 999,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 2017), reh'g denied,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. July 11, 2017).

Compensation for unauthorized medical treatment denied.—

Worker’s compensation claimant was not entitled to benefits when the claimant underwent a surgical procedure to treat a work-related back injury that had not been approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration and was not an off-label use of medical services. Furthermore, the claimant failed to provide sufficient documentation of the procedure’s safety and effectiveness, thus rendering it alternative medicine for which benefits were denied. Harborth v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2018 WY 99, 424 P.3d 1261,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2018).

Applicability.—

This section allowing providers to bill injured workers does not apply to air ambulances. EagleMed, LLC v. Wyoming, 227 F. Supp. 3d 1255, 2016 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 185156 (D. Wyo. 2016), dismissed, 2016 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 191687 (D. Wyo. Aug. 16, 2016), aff'd in part and rev'd in part, 868 F.3d 893, 2017 U.S. App. LEXIS 15962 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2017), dismissed in part, 2018 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 241964 (D. Wyo. Apr. 12, 2018).

Party filing objection.

In a workers' compensation case, the Wyoming Office of Administrative
Hearings had subject matter jurisdiction to hold a contested hearing
because an employer was the appropriate party to the action; the
term
“person” was broadly defined and included individuals doing
business
under a trade name. An interested party properly objected
to the final
determination of compensability, and an argument that
no valid employer
submitted a valid injury report was rejected.
Heikkila v. Signal Mt. Lodge, 2013 WY 23, 295 P.3d 844,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2013).

Applied

in

Painter v. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div., 931 P.2d 953,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1997), overruled on other grounds, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998); Osenbaugh v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 10 P.3d 544,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 2000).

Cited

in

Forni v. Pathfinder Mines, 834 P.2d 688,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1992); State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div. v. Jerding, 868 P.2d 244,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1994); Manning v. State ex rel. Wyo. Worker's Comp. Div., 938 P.2d 870,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1997); Collicott v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2001 WY 35, 20 P.3d 1077,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2001).